Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 175. Joint Contracts

§ 5051.
Action against resident joint contractor.

When a bond, recognizance, bill, note, or other contract has been executed by two or more persons jointly and one or more of them reside out of the State, an action may be sustained thereon against the party residing in the State.

§ 5052.
On joint and several contracts.

An action may be sustained against one or more persons on joint and several contracts executed by three or more of them.
If any of them reside out of the State, the writ shall designate such nonresidents.

§ 5053.
Representative of deceased joint contractor.

When one of the several obligors or promisors jointly holden by a contract in writing dies, the representatives of such deceased person and the surviving obligors or promisors may be charged by virtue of such contract in the same manner as if it had been joint and several.

§ 5054.
Discharge of a joint contractor.

A creditor having a debt or demand against a partnership or several joint obligors or promisors may discharge one or more of such partners, obligors, or promisors without impairing his or her right against the others as to the residue of his or her debt or demand.

§ 5055.
Action against joint contractor not discharged.

In such cases an action may be maintained against those not discharged, setting forth in the complaint that the contract was made with the defendants and the party discharged, and that such party has been discharged.
Such discharge shall have the same effect as a payment by the party discharged, of his or her equal part of the debt, according to the number of debtors aside from sureties.

§ 5056.
Judgment against defendants found liable.

In an action founded on contract, express or implied, or under chapter 161 of this title, in which more persons than one are defendants, the plaintiff may have judgment against such defendants as are defaulted and against those who upon trial are found liable, notwithstanding it is found that all the defendants are not jointly liable.

Parties.

Where plaintiff has claim against all defendants, he cannot, under this section, have judgment against one defendant alone, for a claim against him and another not a party; and if he takes judgment on his claim against all defendants, so long as that judgment stands, he cannot bring upon the record the party jointly liable with only one of the defendants. Smith v. Kellogg, 46 Vt. 560, 1874 Vt. LEXIS 35 (1874).

An action at law, where same person is one of the plaintiffs and also one of the defendants, cannot be sustained, either upon common law principles, or by the provisions of this section. Green v. Chapman, 27 Vt. 236, 1855 Vt. LEXIS 15 (1855).

§§ 5057,
5058.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 5059.
Unsatisfied judgment not bar to further action.

The recovery of judgment against one or more of several obligors or promisors on a joint or joint and several contract, without satisfaction, shall not discharge the other obligors or promisors from their liability on such contract.

§ 5060.
Action for unpaid balance.

When execution on a judgment obtained against a partnership, association, or company in its firm, associate, or company name is returned unsatisfied in whole or in part, an action of contract for the amount unpaid may be brought against any or all of the partners, associates, or shareholders upon their original liability, provided that only one such action shall be brought and maintained at the same time.
If the execution issued in the last named action is returned unsatisfied in whole or in part, subsequent actions may in like manner be maintained for the amount unpaid.

Parties.

The phrase “any or all” means “some,” however few or many; therefore, such supplemental suit may be brought against one, or more, or all of the partners or associates who were such when the liability merged in the judgment was created. Tarbell & Whitman v. Gifford, 79 Vt. 369, 65 A. 80, 1906 Vt. LEXIS 139 (1906).